Utah statutes.
58-1-105.   Employment of staff.

The director, with the approval of the executive director, may employ necessary staff, including specialists and professionals, to assist him in performing the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

